District of Columbia statutes.
42-4051

Expired

Annual rental unit fee.

Expired.

Mar. 4, 1981, D.C. Law 3-131, § 401, 28 DCR 326
Expiration of subchapter: Section 907 of D.C. Law 3-131 provided that all subchapters of this chapter, except subchapter V, shall terminate on April 30, 1985.